Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1313
Property; delivery to State Treasurer; custodian; holder relieved of liability; reimbursement.

Upon the payment or delivery of abandoned property to the State Treasurer or upon payment or delivery of property to the State Treasurer pursuant to section 69-1321, the state shall assume custody and shall be responsible for the safekeeping thereof. Any person who pays or delivers abandoned property to the State Treasurer under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act or who pays or delivers property to the State Treasurer pursuant to section 69-1321 is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property so paid or delivered for any claim which then exists or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property. Any holder who has paid money to the State Treasurer pursuant to the act may make payment to any person appearing to such holder to be entitled thereto, and upon proof of such payment and proof that the payee was entitled thereto, the State Treasurer shall forthwith reimburse the holder for the payment.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 13, p. 2487;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 14.

State Treasurer, credit to the State Treasurer Administrative Fund, see section 84-617.